Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-2424
Cancer drug repository program; established.

The department shall establish a cancer drug repository program for accepting donated cancer drugs and dispensing such drugs to Nebraska residents. Participation in the program shall be voluntary.

Laws 2003, LB 756, § 3.